North Carolina statutes. Chapter 49. Children Born Out of Wedlock.
Article 3. Civil Actions Regarding Children Born Out of Wedlock.

§ 49-14.
Civil action to establish paternity; motion to set aside paternity.

The paternity of a child born out of wedlock may be established by civil action at any time prior to such child’s eighteenth birthday. A copy of a certificate of birth of the child shall be attached to the complaint. The establishment of paternity shall not have the effect of legitimation. The social security numbers, if known, of the minor child’s parents shall be placed in the record of the proceeding.

Proof of paternity pursuant to this section shall be by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

No such action shall be commenced nor judgment entered after the death of the putative father, unless the action is commenced either:

Prior to the death of the putative father;

Within one year after the date of death of the putative father, if a proceeding for administration of the estate of the putative father has not been commenced within one year of his death; or

Within the period specified in G.S. 28A-19-3(a) for presentation of claims against an estate, if a proceeding for administration of the estate of the putative father has been commenced within one year of his death.

Any judgment under this subsection establishing a decedent to be the father of a child shall be entered nunc pro tunc to the day preceding the date of death of the father.

If the action to establish paternity is brought more than three years after birth of a child or is brought after the death of the putative father, paternity shall not be established in a contested case without evidence from a blood or genetic marker test.

Either party to an action to establish paternity may request that the case be tried at the first session of the court after the case is docketed, but the presiding judge, in his discretion, may first try any pending case in which the rights of the parties or the public demand it.

When a determination of paternity is pending in a IV-D case, the court shall enter a temporary order for child support upon motion and showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence of paternity. For purposes of this subsection, the results of blood or genetic tests shall constitute clear, cogent, and convincing evidence of paternity if the tests show that the probability of the alleged parent’s parentage is ninety-seven percent (97%) or higher. If paternity is not thereafter established, then the putative father shall be reimbursed the full amount of temporary support paid under the order.

Invoices for services rendered for pregnancy, childbirth, and blood or genetic testing are admissible as evidence without requiring third party foundation testimony and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the amounts incurred for the services or for testing on behalf of the child.

Notwithstanding the time limitations of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 60 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, or any other provision of law, an order of paternity may be set aside by a trial court if each of the following applies:

The paternity order was entered as the result of fraud, duress, mutual mistake, or excusable neglect.

Genetic tests establish the putative father is not the biological father of the child.

The burden of proof in any motion to set aside an order of paternity shall be on the moving party. Upon proper motion alleging fraud, duress, mutual mistake, or excusable neglect, the court shall order the child’s mother, the child whose parentage is at issue, and the putative father to submit to genetic paternity testing pursuant to

G.S. 8-50.1(b1)

. If the court determines, as a result of genetic testing, the putative father is not the biological father of the child and the order of paternity was entered as a result of fraud, duress, mutual mistake, or excusable neglect, the court may set aside the order of paternity. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect the presumption of legitimacy where a child is born to a mother and the putative father during the course of a marriage.

History.

1967, c. 993, s. 1; 1973, c. 1062, s. 3; 1977, c. 83, s. 2; 1981, c. 599, s. 14; 1985, c. 208, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 333, s. 3; 1995, c. 424, ss. 1, 2; 1997-154, s. 1; 1997-433, ss. 4.2, 4.10; 1998-17, s. 1; 2005-389, s. 3; 2011-328, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to motion or claim for relief from child support order based on
finding of nonpaternity, see

G.S. 50-13.13

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-389, s. 3, effective December 13, 2005, deleted “certified” preceding “copy of a certificate” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2011-328, s. 1, effective January 1, 2012, added “motion to set aside paternity” in the section catchline; and added subsection (h). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

For note on constitutional law and an illegitimate child’s paternal inheritance rights, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 205 (1980).

For survey of 1980 family law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1194 (1981).

For note on a default not constituting an admission of facts for purposes of summary judgment, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 49 (1981).

For survey of 1981 family law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1379 (1982).

For survey of constitutional law in 1982, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1052 (1983).

For 1984 survey, “Intestate Succession of Illegitimate Children in North Carolina,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1274 (1985).

For casenote, “The Established Standard for Fathers Who Have Acknowledged Paternity and Who Are Seeking Custody of Their Illegitimate Child(ren): Rosero v. Blake,

357 N.C. 193

(2003),” see 26 N.C. Cent. L.J. 116 (2003).

§ 49-15.
Custody and support of children born out of wedlock when paternity established.

Upon and after the establishment of paternity pursuant to

G.S. 49-14

of a child born out of wedlock, the rights, duties, and obligations of the mother and the father so established, with regard to support and custody of the child, shall be the same, and may be determined and enforced in the same manner, as if the child were the legitimate child of the father and mother. When paternity has been established, the father becomes responsible for medical expenses incident to the pregnancy and the birth of the child.

History.

1967, c. 993, s. 1; 2013-198, s. 23.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-198, s. 23, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “children born out of wedlock” for “illegitimate children” in the section heading; and substituted “pursuant to

G.S. 49-14

of a child born out of wedlock” for “of an illegitimate child pursuant to

G.S. 49-14

” and substituted “the” for “such” preceding “father and mother.”

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

For survey of 1980 family law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1194 (1981).

For survey of constitutional law in 1982, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1052 (1983).

For article, “Custody of the Illegitimate Child,” see 18 N.C. Cent. L.J. 18 (1989).

For casenote, “The Established Standard for Fathers Who Have Acknowledged Paternity and Who Are Seeking Custody of Their Illegitimate Child(ren): Rosero v. Blake,

357 N.C. 193

(2003),” see 26 N.C. Cent. L.J. 116 (2003).

§ 49-16.
Parties to proceeding.

Proceedings under this Article may be brought by:

The mother, the father, the child, or the personal representative of the mother or the child.

When the child, or the mother in case of medical expenses, is likely to become a public charge, the director of social services or such person as by law performs the duties of such official,

In the county where the mother resides or is found,

In the county where the putative father resides or is found, or

In the county where the child resides or is found.

History.

1967, c. 993, s. 1; 1969, c. 982; 1975, c. 54, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For casenote, “The Established Standard for Fathers Who Have Acknowledged Paternity and Who Are Seeking Custody of Their Illegitimate Child(ren): Rosero v. Blake,

357 N.C. 193

(2003),” see 26 N.C. Cent. L.J. 116 (2003).

§ 49-17.
Jurisdiction over nonresident or nonpresent persons.

The act of sexual intercourse within this State constitutes sufficient minimum contact with this forum for purposes of subjecting the person or persons participating therein to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State for actions brought under this Article for paternity and support of any child who may have been conceived as a result of such act.

The jurisdictional basis in subsection (a) of this section shall be construed in addition to, and not in lieu of, any basis or bases for jurisdiction within

G.S. 1-75.4

.

History.

1979, c. 542.